Tennessee statutes. Title 19 Civil Procedure In General Sessions Courts
Chapter 1

General Provisions [Repealed or Transferred]

19-1-101 — 19-1-122. [Repealed or transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 19-1-101 — 19-1-122 was repealed or transferred by Acts 1993, ch. 241.

Sections 19-1-101 — 19-1-104, 19-1-107 — 19-1-111, 19-1-115, and 19-1-119 (Acts 1858, §§ 2753, 4124, 4144-4146, 4150, 4152-4159, 4163-4166, 4178; 1879, ch. 94, § 1; Shannon §§ 4444, 5936, 5956-5958, 5962, 5964-5972, 5976-5978, 5990; Code 1932, §§ 8570, 10137, 10157-10159, 13163, 10165-10173, 10177-10179, 10191; Acts 1970, ch. 342, § 1; 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-401 — 19-404, 19-408, 19-409, 19-411 — 19-415, 19-420 — 19-422, 19-426), concerning application of general code provisions, commencement of actions, security required of plaintiffs, process in writing, notice of trial, hour of trial and appearances by parties, applicability of equity principles, continuances, filing of evidence of debt, reading of docket entries, transcripts and the presumption of appeal, were repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, §§ 29-32, 35-39, 43 and 47.

Former §§ 19-1-105, 19-1-106, 19-1-112 — 19-1-114, 19-1-116 — 19-1-118, and 19-1-120 — 19-1-122, concerning attachment, proceedings after attachment, cross actions, judgment for defendant on setoff, remittitur, correction of judgment, presumptions of validity of prior proceedings and of regularity of execution, interpleader actions, and removal of actions, were transferred by Acts 1993, ch. 241, to §§ 16-15-722 — 16-15-732.